Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 26 State Disbursement Unit for the Collection and Distribution of Child Support

15-26-1.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to establish and operate a centralized state collection and disbursement unit within the department of administration, division of taxation, child support enforcement for the timely, automated collection and disbursement of support orders being enforced under § 454(4) of title IV-D of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 654(4), and in all cases not being enforced by the state in which the support order is initially issued in the state on or after October 1, 1998, and in which the income of the non-custodial parent is subject to income withholding.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 18; P.L. 2001, ch. 155, § 6.

15-26-2.
Operation.

The centralized state collection and disbursement unit shall be operated directly by the department of administration, division of taxation or its designee and in coordination with the automated system.

The centralized state collection and disbursement unit shall use the automated procedures, electronic processes, including the electronic funds transfer (EFT) provisions as authorized by the tax administrator under §

44-1-31

, and computer driven technology to the maximum extent feasible, efficient and economical for the collection and disbursement of support payments, including procedures for receipt from parents, employers, and other states, and for disbursement to custodial parents and other obligees, the state agency, and the agencies of other states:

For accurate identification of payments;

To ensure prompt disbursement of the custodial parent’s share of any payment; and

To furnish to any parent, upon request, timely information on the current status of support payments.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 18; P.L. 2002, ch. 225, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 11.

15-26-3.
Timing of disbursement.

The department of administration, division of taxation, child support enforcement or its designee shall distribute all amounts payable within two (2) business days after receipt from the employer or other source of periodic income if sufficient information identifying the payee is provided. “Business day” is defined as a day on which state offices are open for regular business.

The department of administration, division of taxation, child support enforcement or its designee may delay the distribution of collections toward disputed arrearages until the resolution of those disputed arrearages in a timely hearing before the Rhode Island family court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 18.

15-26-4.
Change in payee.

In cases in which support is assigned to the state pursuant to §

40-6-9

and where there is an existing child support order made payable to the obligee, after notice to the obligor and obligee, the state collection and disbursement unit and/or any other state or federal agency taking action to establish or enforce a child support or medical order shall direct the obligor or other payer through a wage withholding order to change the payee to the appropriate instate or interstate government entity without the necessity of a court order or a hearing relative to the child support order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 18; P.L. 2001, ch. 155, § 6.